Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.235

State agency information technology portfolio—Exemptions.

(1) Each state agency shall develop an information technology portfolio consistent with RCW 43.105.341. The superintendent of public instruction shall develop its portfolio in conjunction with educational service districts and statewide or regional providers of K-12 education information technology services.

(2) The director may exempt any state agency from any or all of the requirements of this section.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 206; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 710. Formerly RCW 43.41A.045.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.